Utah statutes.
62A-15-628.   Involuntary commitment -- Procedures.

(1)  An adult may not be involuntarily committed to the custody of a local mental health authority except under the following provisions:

(a)  emergency procedures for temporary commitment upon medical or designated examiner certification, as provided in Subsection 62A-15-629(1);

(b)  emergency procedures for temporary commitment without endorsement of medical or designated examiner certification, as provided in Subsection 62A-15-629(2); or

(c)  commitment on court order, as provided in Section 62A-15-631.

(2)  A person under 18 years of age may be committed to the physical custody of a local mental health authority only after a court commitment proceeding in accordance with the provisions of Part 7, Commitment of Persons Under Age 18 to Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health.

